California, session 20252026, SB1223.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3107 is added to the Food and Agricultural Code, to read:3107. (a) A fair shall not issue any invitation to bid or request for proposal, in connection with the awarding of a contract, for services to any person or entity, in a manner that limits the bidding directly or indirectly to any one bidder.(b) Any contract awarded in violation of subdivision (a) shall be void.(c) For purposes of this section, “fair” means a fair as defined in Section 3101, 3102, 3103, or 3104.